Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 2. Weapons and Explosives.

Collateral references. —

31A Am. Jur. 2d, Explosions and Explosives, §§ 167-193

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Weapons and Firearms, §§ 1-40.

35 C.J.S., Explosives, § 1 et seq

94 C.J.S., Weapons, §§ 9-51.

Validity of state statutes restricting right of aliens to bear arms, 28 ALR4th 1096.

Sufficiency of evidence of possession in prosecution under statute prohibiting persons under indictment for or convicted of crime from acquiring, having, carrying or using firearms or weapons,
43 ALR4th 788.

Validity of state statute proscribing possession or carrying of knife, 47 ALR4th 651.

Validity of state gun control legislation under state constitutional provisions securing the right to bear arms, 86 ALR4th 931

Federal constitutional right to bear arms, 37 ALR Fed. 696.

Construction and application of 18 U.S.C.A. § 922(e), prohibiting delivery of firearms to common carrier, 125 ALR Fed. 613

Sec. 11.61.190.
Misconduct involving weapons in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving weapons in the first degree if the person

uses or attempts to use a firearm during the commission of an offense under AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.040

; or

discharges a firearm from a propelled vehicle while the vehicle is being operated and under circumstances manifesting substantial and unjustifiable risk of physical injury to a person or damage to property.

Misconduct involving weapons in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 10 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 1996)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.61.195.
Misconduct involving weapons in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving weapons in the second degree if the person knowingly

possesses a firearm during the commission of an offense under AS

11.71.010

—

11.71.040

;

violates AS

11.61.200(a)(1)

and is within the grounds of or on a parking lot immediately adjacent to

a public or private preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary school without the permission of the chief administrative officer of the school or district or the designee of the chief administrative officer; or

an entity, other than a private residence, licensed as a child care facility under AS 47.32 or recognized by the federal government for the care of children; or

discharges a firearm at or in the direction of

a building with reckless disregard for a risk of physical injury to a person; or

a dwelling.

Misconduct involving weapons in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 10 ch 79 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 124 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 130 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 4 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 55(b), ch. 57, SLA 2005, until June 30, 2006, the reference to AS 47.32 in this section includes former AS 47.33 and 47.35.

Sec. 11.61.200.
Misconduct involving weapons in the third degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving weapons in the third degree if the person

knowingly possesses a firearm capable of being concealed on one’s person after having been convicted of a felony or adjudicated a delinquent minor for conduct that would constitute a felony if committed by an adult by a court of this state, a court of the United States, or a court of another state or territory;

knowingly sells or transfers a firearm capable of being concealed on one’s person to a person who has been convicted of a felony by a court of this state, a court of the United States, or a court of another state or territory;

manufactures, possesses, transports, sells, or transfers a prohibited weapon;

knowingly sells or transfers a firearm to another whose physical or mental condition is substantially impaired as a result of the introduction of an intoxicating liquor or controlled substance into that other person’s body;

removes, covers, alters, or destroys the manufacturer’s serial number on a firearm with intent to render the firearm untraceable;

possesses a firearm on which the manufacturer’s serial number has been removed, covered, altered, or destroyed, knowing that the serial number has been removed, covered, altered, or destroyed with the intent of rendering the firearm untraceable;

violates AS

11.46.320

and, during the violation, possesses on the person a firearm when the person’s physical or mental condition is impaired as a result of the introduction of an intoxicating liquor or controlled substance into the person’s body;

violates AS

11.46.320

or

11.46.330

by entering or remaining unlawfully on premises or in a propelled vehicle in violation of a provision of an order issued or filed under AS

18.66.100

—

18.66.180

or issued under former AS 25.35.010(b) or 25.35.020 and, during the violation, possesses on the person a defensive weapon or a deadly weapon, other than an ordinary pocketknife;

communicates in person with another in violation of AS

11.56.740

and, during the communication, possesses on the person a defensive weapon or a deadly weapon, other than an ordinary pocketknife;

resides in a dwelling knowing that there is a firearm capable of being concealed on one’s person or a prohibited weapon in the dwelling if the person has been convicted of a felony by a court of this state, a court of the United States, or a court of another state or territory, unless the person has written authorization to live in a dwelling in which there is a concealable weapon described in this paragraph from a court of competent jurisdiction or from the head of the law enforcement agency of the community in which the dwelling is located; or

discharges a firearm from a propelled vehicle while the vehicle is being operated in circumstances other than described in AS

11.61.190(a)(2)

.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 100 SLA 2010.]

The provisions of

(a)(1) of this section do not apply to a person if

the person convicted of the prior offense on which the action is based received a pardon for that conviction;

the underlying conviction upon which the action is based has been set aside under AS

12.55.085

or as a result of post-conviction proceedings; or

a period of 10 years or more has elapsed between the date of the person’s unconditional discharge on the prior offense or adjudication of juvenile delinquency and the date of the violation of (a)(1) of this section, and the prior conviction or adjudication of juvenile delinquency did not result from a violation of AS 11.41 or of a similar law of the United States or of another state or territory;

(a)(2) or (10) of this section do not apply to a person if

the person convicted of the prior offense on which the action is based received a pardon for that conviction;

the underlying conviction upon which the action is based has been set aside under AS

12.55.085

or as a result of post-conviction proceedings; or

a period of 10 years or more has elapsed between the date of the person’s unconditional discharge on the prior offense and the date of the violation of (a)(2) or (10) of this section, and the prior conviction did not result from a violation of AS 11.41 or of a similar law of the United States or of another state or territory.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a)(3) of this section that the manufacture, possession, transportation, sale, or transfer of the prohibited weapon was in accordance with registration under 26 U.S.C. 5801-5872 (National Firearms Act).

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a)(11) of this section that the person was using a firearm while hunting, trapping, or fishing in a manner not prohibited by statute or regulation.

The provisions of (a)(3) and (11) of this section do not apply to a peace officer acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 100 SLA 2010.]

[Repealed, § 2 ch 100 SLA 2010.]

As used in this section,

“prohibited weapon” means any

explosive, incendiary, or noxious gas

device designed, made, or adapted to muffle the report of a firearm;

firearm that is capable of shooting more than one shot automatically, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger; or

rifle with a barrel length of less than 16 inches, shotgun with a barrel length of less than 18 inches, or firearm made from a rifle or shotgun which, as modified, has an overall length of less than 26 inches;

Misconduct involving weapons in the third degree is a class C felony.

mine or device that is designed, made, or adapted for the purpose of inflicting serious physical injury or death;

(ii)

rocket, other than an emergency flare, having a propellant charge of more than four ounces;

(iii)

bomb; or

(iv)

grenade;

(2)

“unconditional discharge” has the meaning ascribed to it in AS

12.55.185

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 189 SLA 1990; am §§ 4 — 6 ch 59 SLA 1991; am § 3 ch 64 SLA 1991; am §§ 11 — 14 ch 79 SLA 1992; am §§ 2, 3 ch 113 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 60 SLA 1996; am § 7 ch 64 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 1 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 100 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intoxication as applicable to possession of a firearm” — AS

11.61.215

(repealed 1991).

Definition of “possess,” “firearm,” “drug,” “affirmative defense,” “peace officer,” “explosive,” “metal knuckles” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Removal of identification marks; unlawful possession — AS

11.46.260

,

11.46.270

Original Code Provision — AS 11.55.030.

TD: V, 108-110.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (a)(8) and (9) of this section were enacted as (a)(7) and (8) respectively. Renumbered in 1990.

Subsection (d) enacted as (g).
Relettered in 1992, at which time former subsections (d)-(f) were relettered as (e)-(g), respectively.

Former subsections (f) and (g) were enacted as (h) and (i), respectively.
Relettered in 1998, at which time existing subsections (f) and (g) were relettered as (h) and (i), respectively.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 16(2), ch. 113, SLA 1994 provides that the amendments to (a) and (b) of this section by §§ 2 and 3, ch. 113, SLA 1994 apply “to offenses committed on or after September 1, 1994.”

Sec. 11.61.210.
Misconduct involving weapons in the fourth degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving weapons in the fourth degree if the person

possesses on the person, or in the interior of a vehicle in which the person is present, a firearm when the person’s physical or mental condition is impaired as a result of the introduction of an intoxicating liquor or a controlled substance into the person’s body in circumstances other than described in AS

11.61.200(a)(7)

;

discharges a firearm from, on, or across a highway;

discharges a firearm with reckless disregard for a risk of damage to property or a risk of physical injury to a person under circumstances other than those described in AS

11.61.195(a)(3)(A)

;

manufactures, possesses, transports, sells, or transfers metal knuckles;

sells or transfers a switchblade or a gravity knife to a person under 18 years of age without the prior written consent of the person’s parent or guardian;

knowingly sells a firearm or a defensive weapon to a person under 18 years of age;

other than a preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary school student, knowingly possesses a deadly weapon or a defensive weapon, without the permission of the chief administrative officer of the school or district or the designee of the chief administrative officer, within the buildings of, on the grounds of, or on the school parking lot of a public or private preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary school, on a school bus while being transported to or from school or a school-sponsored event, or while participating in a school-sponsored event, except that a person 21 years of age or older may possess

a deadly weapon, other than a loaded firearm, in the trunk of a motor vehicle or encased in a closed container in a motor vehicle;

a defensive weapon;

an unloaded firearm if the person is traversing school premises in a rural area for the purpose of entering public or private land that is open to hunting and the school board with jurisdiction over the school premises has elected to have this exemption apply to the school premises; in this subparagraph, “rural” means a community with a population of 5,500 or less that is not connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks or with a population of 1,500 or less that is connected by road or rail to Anchorage or Fairbanks; or

being a preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary school student, knowingly possesses a deadly weapon or a defensive weapon, within the buildings of, on the grounds of, or on the school parking lot of a public or private preschool, elementary, junior high, or secondary school, on a school bus while being transported to or from school or a school-sponsored event, or while participating in a school-sponsored event, except that a student may possess a deadly weapon, other than a firearm as defined under 18 U.S.C. 921, or a defensive weapon if the student has obtained the prior permission of the chief administrative officer of the school or district or the designee of the chief administrative officer for the possession.

[Repealed, § 4 ch 63 SLA 1990.]

The provisions of (a)(7) of this section do not apply to a peace officer acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment.

Misconduct involving weapons in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 21, 22 ch 102 SLA 1980; am §§ 2, 4 ch 63 SLA 1990; am § 7 ch 59 SLA 1991; am §§ 15, 16 ch 79 SLA 1992; am §§ 1, 2 ch 33 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intoxication as applicable to possession of a firearm” — AS

11.61.215

.

Definition of “possess,” “firearm,” “drug,” “highway,” “property,” “physical injury” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Reckless endangerment — AS

11.41.250

Original Code Provision — AS 11.55.060; AS 11.55.065; AS 11.55.070.

TD: V, 110-111.

Definition of “possess,” “firearm,” “drug” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Misconduct involving weapons in the first degree — AS

11.61.200

Misconduct involving weapons in the second degree — AS

11.61.210

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as (d). Relettered in 1995. Subsection (d) was formerly (b); relettered as (c) in 1980 and relettered again in 1995.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.61.215.
Intoxication as applicable to possession of a firearm. [Repealed, § 11 ch 59 SLA 1991.]

Sec. 11.61.220.
Misconduct involving weapons in the fifth degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving weapons in the fifth degree if the person

is 21 years of age or older and knowingly possesses a deadly weapon, other than an ordinary pocket knife or a defensive weapon,

that is concealed on the person, and, when contacted by a peace officer, the person fails to

immediately inform the peace officer of that possession; or

allow the peace officer to secure the deadly weapon, or fails to secure the weapon at the direction of the peace officer, during the duration of the contact;

that is concealed on the person within the residence of another person unless the person has first obtained the express permission of an adult residing there to bring a concealed deadly weapon within the residence;

knowingly possesses a loaded firearm on the person in any place where intoxicating liquor is sold for consumption on the premises;

being an unemancipated minor under 16 years of age, possesses a firearm, switchblade, or gravity knife without the consent of a parent or guardian of the minor;

knowingly possesses a firearm

within the grounds of or on a parking lot immediately adjacent to an entity, other than a private residence, licensed as a child care facility under AS 47.32 or recognized by the federal government for the care of children, except that a person 21 years of age or older may possess an unloaded firearm in the trunk of a motor vehicle or encased in a closed container of a motor vehicle;

within a

courtroom or office of the Alaska Court System; or

courthouse that is occupied only by the Alaska Court System and other justice-related agencies; or

within a domestic violence or sexual assault shelter that receives funding from the state;

[Repealed, § 7 ch 54 SLA 2013.]

is less than 21 years of age and knowingly possesses a deadly weapon, other than an ordinary pocket knife or a defensive weapon, that is concealed on the person.

In a prosecution under (a)(6) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was

in the defendant’s dwelling or on land owned or leased by the defendant appurtenant to the dwelling; or

actually engaged in lawful hunting, fishing, trapping, or other lawful outdoor activity that necessarily involves the carrying of a weapon for personal protection.

The provisions of (a)(2) and (4) of this section do not apply to a peace officer acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment.

In a prosecution under (a)(2) of this section, it is

an affirmative defense that

[Repealed, § 7 ch 62 SLA 2003.]

the loaded firearm was a concealed handgun as defined in AS

18.65.790

; and

the possession occurred at a place designated as a restaurant for the purposes of AS

04.16.049

and the defendant did not consume intoxicating liquor at the place;

a defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was on business premises

owned by or leased by the defendant; or

in the course of the defendant’s employment for the owner or lessee of those premises.

For purposes of this section, a deadly weapon on a person is concealed if it is covered or enclosed in any manner so that an observer cannot determine that it is a weapon without removing it from that which covers or encloses it or without opening, lifting, or removing that which covers or encloses it; a deadly weapon on a person is not concealed if it is an unloaded firearm encased in a closed container designed for transporting firearms.

For purposes of (a)(2) and (e) of this section, a firearm is loaded if the

firing chamber, magazine, clip, or cylinder of the firearm contains a cartridge; and

chamber, magazine, clip, or cylinder is installed in or on the firearm.

The provisions of (a)(1) and (6) of this section do not apply to a

peace officer of this state or a municipality of this state acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment;

peace officer employed by another state or a political subdivision of another state who, at the time of the possession, is

certified as a peace officer by the other state; and

acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment; or

police officer of this state or a police officer or chief administrative officer of a municipality of this state; in this paragraph, “police officer” and “chief administrative officer” have the meanings given in AS

18.65.290

.

In a prosecution

under (a)(4)(B) of this section, it is a defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was authorized to possess the firearm under a rule of court;

under (a)(4)(C) of this section, it is a defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was authorized in writing by the administrator of the shelter to possess the firearm.

In (a)(1) of this section, “contacted by a peace officer” means stopped, detained, questioned, or addressed in person by the peace officer for an official purpose.

Misconduct involving weapons in the fifth degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 23 ch 102 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 9 ch 59 SLA 1991; am §§ 17, 18 ch 79 SLA 1992; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 124 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 130 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 33 SLA 1995; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 1999; am §§ 1, 2 ch 94 SLA 2000; am §§ 1 — 4, 7 ch 62 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 7 ch 54 SLA 2013)

Cross references. —

Definition of “deadly weapon,” “possess,” “firearm,” “premises,” “affirmative defense,” “dwelling,” “property,” “peace officer,” “defense,” “leased” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision — AS 11.55.020

TD: V, 112-115.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Revisor’s notes. —

Paragraphs (h)(1) and (h)(2) were enacted as (i)(A) and (i)(B); renumbered in 1998. Subsections (g) — (j) were relettered as (j) and (g) — (i) respectively in 2016 for consistency with the drafting style of AS 11.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 55(b), ch. 57, SLA 2005, until June 30, 2006, the reference to AS 47.32 in this section includes former AS 47.33 and AS 47.35.

Legislative history reports. —

For revision of 1978 legislative committee report on
AS

11.61.220

, see 1979 House Journal, pp. 632-633.
For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Because AS 11.55.020 (now this section) excepts only “peace officers” from the general prohibition against carrying concealed weapons, other persons, including state employees charged with limited law enforcement duties unless a peace officer within the meaning of AS

01.10.060

(6) (now (7)), may not carry concealed weapons. December 22, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.

A comparison of the language of AS

18.65.010(b)

, which describes the general powers and duties of a specially commissioned officer with that of AS

18.65.080

, which describes the powers and duties of commissioned officers of the Department of Public Safety with particular reference to “member” of the state troopers, supports the conclusion that a specially commissioned officer is a “peace officer” for purposes of both AS

01.10.060

(6) (now (7)) and AS 11.55.020 (now this section) when performing law enforcement duties within the limitations set forth on the face of a special commission and, furthermore, may carry concealed weapons without violating AS 11.55.010 (now this section) while performing these duties to the extent permitted by the commission itself.
December 22, 1977, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 11.61.220.
Misconduct involving weapons in the fifth degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving weapons in the fifth degree if the person

is 21 years of age or older and knowingly possesses a deadly weapon, other than an ordinary pocket knife or a defensive weapon,

that is concealed on the person, and, when contacted by a peace officer, the person fails to

immediately inform the peace officer of that possession; or

allow the peace officer to secure the deadly weapon, or fails to secure the weapon at the direction of the peace officer, during the duration of the contact;

that is concealed on the person within the residence of another person unless the person has first obtained the express permission of an adult residing there to bring a concealed deadly weapon within the residence;

knowingly possesses a loaded firearm on the person in any place where intoxicating liquor is sold for consumption on the premises;

being an unemancipated minor under 16 years of age, possesses a firearm, switchblade, or gravity knife without the consent of a parent or guardian of the minor;

knowingly possesses a firearm

within the grounds of or on a parking lot immediately adjacent to an entity, other than a private residence, licensed as a child care facility under AS 47.32 or recognized by the federal government for the care of children, except that a person 21 years of age or older may possess an unloaded firearm in the trunk of a motor vehicle or encased in a closed container of a motor vehicle;

within a

courtroom or office of the Alaska Court System; or

courthouse that is occupied only by the Alaska Court System and other justice-related agencies; or

within a domestic violence or sexual assault shelter that receives funding from the state;

[Repealed, § 7 ch 54 SLA 2013.]

is less than 21 years of age and knowingly possesses a deadly weapon, other than an ordinary pocket knife or a defensive weapon, that is concealed on the person.

In a prosecution under (a)(6) of this section, it is an affirmative defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was

in the defendant’s dwelling or on land owned or leased by the defendant appurtenant to the dwelling; or

actually engaged in lawful hunting, fishing, trapping, or other lawful outdoor activity that necessarily involves the carrying of a weapon for personal protection.

The provisions of (a)(2) and (4) of this section do not apply to a peace officer acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment.

In a prosecution under (a)(2) of this section, it is

an affirmative defense that

the loaded firearm was a concealed handgun as defined in AS

18.65.790

; and

the possession occurred at a place covered by a restaurant or eating place license under AS

04.09.210

, seasonal restaurant or eating place tourism license under AS

04.09.360

, or restaurant endorsement under AS

04.09.450

and the defendant did not consume intoxicating liquor at the place;

a defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was on business premises

owned by or leased by the defendant; or

in the course of the defendant’s employment for the owner or lessee of those premises.

For purposes of this section, a deadly weapon on a person is concealed if it is covered or enclosed in any manner so that an observer cannot determine that it is a weapon without removing it from that which covers or encloses it or without opening, lifting, or removing that which covers or encloses it; a deadly weapon on a person is not concealed if it is an unloaded firearm encased in a closed container designed for transporting firearms.

For purposes of (a)(2) and (e) of this section, a firearm is loaded if the

firing chamber, magazine, clip, or cylinder of the firearm contains a cartridge; and

chamber, magazine, clip, or cylinder is installed in or on the firearm.

The provisions of (a)(1) and (6) of this section do not apply to a

peace officer of this state or a municipality of this state acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment;

peace officer employed by another state or a political subdivision of another state who, at the time of the possession, is

certified as a peace officer by the other state; and

acting within the scope and authority of the officer’s employment; or

police officer of this state or a police officer or chief administrative officer of a municipality of this state; in this paragraph, “police officer” and “chief administrative officer” have the meanings given in AS

18.65.290

.

In a prosecution

under (a)(4)(B) of this section, it is a defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was authorized to possess the firearm under a rule of court;

under (a)(4)(C) of this section, it is a defense that the defendant, at the time of possession, was authorized in writing by the administrator of the shelter to possess the firearm.

In (a)(1) of this section, “contacted by a peace officer” means stopped, detained, questioned, or addressed in person by the peace officer for an official purpose.

Misconduct involving weapons in the fifth degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 23 ch 102 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 9 ch 59 SLA 1991; am §§ 17, 18 ch 79 SLA 1992; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 67 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 124 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 130 SLA 1994; am § 3 ch 33 SLA 1995; am §§ 4 — 8 ch 1 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 1998; am § 4 ch 58 SLA 1999; am §§ 1, 2 ch 94 SLA 2000; am §§ 1 — 4, 7 ch 62 SLA 2003; am § 4 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 5 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§ 2, 7 ch 54 SLA 2013; am § 152 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 11.61.230.
[Renumbered as AS 11.46.315.]

Sec. 11.61.240.
Criminal possession of explosives.

A person commits the crime of criminal possession of explosives if the person possesses or manufactures an explosive substance or device and intends to use that substance or device to commit a crime.

Criminal possession of explosives is a

class A felony if the crime intended is murder in any degree or kidnapping;

class B felony if the crime intended is a class A felony;

class C felony if the crime intended is a class B felony;

class A misdemeanor if the crime intended is a class C felony;

class B misdemeanor if the crime intended is a class A or class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

For punishment, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment for class A felonies, AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment for class B felonies, AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment for class C felonies, AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors, AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment for class B misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.61.250.
Unlawful furnishing of explosives.

A person commits the crime of unlawful furnishing of explosives if the person furnishes an explosive substance or device to another knowing that the other intends to use the substance or device to commit a crime.

Unlawful furnishing of explosives is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 7 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “explosive,” “possess” — AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” — AS

11.81.900(a)

Attempt — AS

11.31.100

Original Code Provision — None.

TD: V, 117-118.

For provisions concerning the transportation of explosives, see
AS

42.30.060

-

42.30.100

.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.